Utah statutes.
4-11-13.   Unlawful acts specified.

It is unlawful for a person to:

(1)  extract honey in any place where bees can gain access either during or after the extraction process;

(2)  remove honey or wax, or attempt to salvage, or salvage any hives, apiary equipment, or appliances from a diseased colony, except in a licensed wax-salvage plant, unless specifically authorized by a county bee inspector or the commissioner;

(3)  maintain any neglected or abandoned hives, apiary equipment, or appliances other than in an enclosure that prohibits the entrance of bees;

(4)  raise bees without being registered with the department;

(5)  operate a wax-salvage plant without a license;

(6)  store an empty hive body, apiary equipment, or appliances in a manner that may propagate pests, disease, or bee feeding frenzy; or

(7)  knowingly sell a colony, apiary equipment, or appliances that are inoculated with terminal disease pathogens.

